Utah statutes.
75-3-1204.   Small estates -- Closing by sworn statement of personal
representative.
(1)  Unless prohibited by order of the court and except for estates being
administered by supervised personal representatives, a personal representative
may close an estate administered under the summary procedures of Section
75-3-1203 by filing with the court, at any time after disbursement and
distribution of the estate, a verified statement stating:
(a)  the nature and value of the estate's assets at the time of distribution;
(b)  that to the best knowledge of the personal representative, the value of
the entire estate, less liens and encumbrances, did not exceed homestead
allowance, exempt property, family allowance, costs and expenses of
administration, reasonable funeral expenses, and reasonable, necessary medical
and hospital expenses of the last illness of the decedent;
(c)  that the personal representative has fully administered the estate by
disbursing and distributing it to the persons entitled thereto; and
(d)  that the personal representative has sent a copy of the closing statement
to all distributees of the estate and to all creditors or other claimants of
whom the personal representative is aware whose claims are neither paid nor
barred and has furnished a full account in writing of administration to the
distributees whose interests are affected.
(2)  If no actions or proceedings involving the personal representative are
pending in the court one year after the closing statement is filed, the
appointment of the personal representative terminates.
(3)  A closing statement filed under this section has the same effect as one
filed under Section 75-3-1003.
